dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX N Y 68
SFX N 0 ation [^aeiou]l 
SFX N 0 ation [^aeiou]m 
SFX N e ation [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX N 0 ation [^bdelmrstxy] 
SFX N e ation [^crbv][mi][^bcdkmztrlvgun]e 
SFX N 0 ation [^e]r 
SFX N e ation [^emnx][rc]ise 
SFX N 0 ation [^i]t 
SFX N e ation [^uriolsna][^bcdkmztrlvgu]e 
SFX N e ation [btv][e][rc]ise 
SFX N e ation [iou]te 
SFX N 0 ation's [^aeiou]l 
SFX N 0 ation's [^aeiou]m 
SFX N e ation's [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX N 0 ation's [^bdelmrstxy] 
SFX N e ation's [^crbv][mi][^bcdkmztrlvgun]e 
SFX N 0 ation's [^e]r 
SFX N e ation's [^emnx][rc]ise 
SFX N 0 ation's [^i]t 
SFX N e ation's [^uriolsna][^bcdkmztrlvgu]e 
SFX N e ation's [btv][e][rc]ise 
SFX N e ation's [iou]te 
SFX N ke cation ke 
SFX N ke cation's ke 
SFX N y ication y 
SFX N y ication's y 
SFX N e ion [^i]cise 
SFX N e ion [^iou]te 
SFX N 0 ion [^m]it 
SFX N e ion [rsn]se 
SFX N 0 ion [sx] 
SFX N e ion [tfl]use 
SFX N e ion [v]ise 
SFX N e ion ulse 
SFX N e ion's [^i]cise 
SFX N e ion's [^iou]te 
SFX N 0 ion's [^m]it 
SFX N e ion's [rsn]se 
SFX N 0 ion's [sx] 
SFX N e ion's [tfl]use 
SFX N e ion's [v]ise 
SFX N e ion's ulse 
SFX N e ition ose 
SFX N e ition's ose 
SFX N 0 lation [aiou]l 
SFX N 0 lation's [aiou]l 
SFX N e mation [^u]me 
SFX N 0 mation [aeiou]m 
SFX N e mation's [^u]me 
SFX N 0 mation's [aeiou]m 
SFX N b ption b 
SFX N be ption be 
SFX N e ption ume 
SFX N b ption's b 
SFX N be ption's be 
SFX N e ption's ume 
SFX N er ration er 
SFX N er ration's er 
SFX N d sion d 
SFX N de sion de 
SFX N d sion's d 
SFX N de sion's de 
SFX N t ssion mit 
SFX N t ssion's mit 
SFX N e tion ce 
SFX N e tion's ce 
SFX N el ulsion el 
SFX N el ulsion's el 
SFX n Y 42
SFX n 0 ation [^aeiou]l 
SFX n 0 ation [^aelry] 
SFX n e ation [^ckt]e 
SFX n 0 ation [^e]r 
SFX n e ation [iou]te 
SFX n y ation py 
SFX n 0 ation's [^aeiou]l 
SFX n 0 ation's [^aelry] 
SFX n e ation's [^ckt]e 
SFX n 0 ation's [^e]r 
SFX n e ation's [iou]te 
SFX n y ation's py 
SFX n 0 ations [^aeiou]l 
SFX n 0 ations [^aelry] 
SFX n e ations [^ckt]e 
SFX n 0 ations [^e]r 
SFX n e ations [iou]te 
SFX n y ations py 
SFX n ke cation ke 
SFX n ke cation's ke 
SFX n ke cations ke 
SFX n y ication [^p]y 
SFX n y ication's [^p]y 
SFX n y ications [^p]y 
SFX n e ion [^iou]te 
SFX n e ion's [^iou]te 
SFX n e ions [^iou]te 
SFX n 0 lation [aiou]l 
SFX n 0 lation's [aiou]l 
SFX n 0 lations [aiou]l 
SFX n er ration er 
SFX n er ration's er 
SFX n er rations er 
SFX n 0 tion a 
SFX n e tion ce 
SFX n 0 tion's a
SFX n e tion's ce 
SFX n 0 tions a 
SFX n e tions ce 
SFX n el ulsion el 
SFX n el ulsion's el 
SFX n el ulsions el 
SFX X Y 26
SFX X 0 ations [^aeiou]l 
SFX X 0 ations [^aeiou]m 
SFX X e ations [^bcdkmst]e 
SFX X 0 ations [^bdelmrstxy] 
SFX X 0 ations [^e]r 
SFX X 0 ations [^i]t 
SFX X e ations [iou]te 
SFX X ke cations ke 
SFX X y ications y 
SFX X e ions [^iou]te 
SFX X 0 ions [^m]it 
SFX X e ions [^o]se 
SFX X 0 ions [sx] 
SFX X e itions ose 
SFX X 0 lations [aiou]l 
SFX X e mations [^u]me 
SFX X 0 mations [aeiou]m 
SFX X b ptions b 
SFX X be ptions be 
SFX X e ptions ume 
SFX X er rations er 
SFX X d sions d 
SFX X de sions de 
SFX X t ssions mit 
SFX X e tions ce 
SFX X el ulsions el 
SFX x Y 40
SFX x 0 ational [^aeiou]l 
SFX x e ational [^bcdkst]e 
SFX x 0 ational [^bdelrstxy] 
SFX x 0 ational [^e]r 
SFX x 0 ational nt 
SFX x 0 ationally [^aeiou]l 
SFX x e ationally [^bcdkst]e 
SFX x 0 ationally [^bdelrstxy] 
SFX x 0 ationally [^e]r 
SFX x 0 ationally nt 
SFX x ke cational ke 
SFX x ke cationally ke 
SFX x y icational y 
SFX x y icationally y 
SFX x 0 ional [^n]t 
SFX x e ional [^o]se 
SFX x 0 ional [sx] 
SFX x e ional te 
SFX x 0 ionally [^n]t 
SFX x e ionally [^o]se 
SFX x 0 ionally [sx] 
SFX x e ionally te 
SFX x e itional ose 
SFX x e itionally ose 
SFX x 0 lational [aiou]l 
SFX x 0 lationally [aiou]l 
SFX x b ptional b 
SFX x be ptional be 
SFX x b ptionally b 
SFX x be ptionally be 
SFX x er rational er 
SFX x er rationally er 
SFX x d sional d 
SFX x de sional de 
SFX x d sionally d 
SFX x de sionally de 
SFX x e tional ce 
SFX x e tionally ce 
SFX x el ulsional el 
SFX x el ulsionally el 
SFX H N 13
SFX H 0 fold . 
SFX H ve fth ve 
SFX H ve fths ve 
SFX H 0 h t 
SFX H 0 hs t 
SFX H y ieth y 
SFX H y ieths y 
SFX H ree ird ree 
SFX H ree irds ree 
SFX H 0 th [^ety] 
SFX H e th [^ev]e 
SFX H 0 ths [^ety] 
SFX H e ths [^ev]e 
SFX Y Y 9
SFX Y 0 ally ic 
SFX Y y ily [^aeiou]y 
SFX Y 0 ly [^cely] 
SFX Y 0 ly [^i]c 
SFX Y 0 ly [^l]e 
SFX Y 0 ly [aeiou][ly] 
SFX Y 0 ly [aeiou]le 
SFX Y 0 y [^aeiou]l 
SFX Y e y [^aeiou]le 
SFX G Y 33
SFX G 0 bing [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX G 0 ding [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX G 0 fing [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX G 0 ging [^aeiol][aeiou]g 
SFX G 0 ging [^ao][l][aeiou]g 
SFX G 0 ing [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX G 0 ing [^ai][lvbmpndcg][oe]r 
SFX G 0 ing [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX G e ing [^eioy]e 
SFX G 0 ing [a][bvpm][o][r] 
SFX G 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX G 0 ing [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX G 0 ing [aeo]al 
SFX G 0 ing [ao]log 
SFX G 0 ing [emfo][eniu][tb][e]r 
SFX G 0 ing [eoy]e 
SFX G 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX G 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX G 0 ling [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX G 0 ling [^aeo]al 
SFX G 0 ming [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX G 0 ning [^aeio][aeiou]n 
SFX G 0 ping [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX G 0 ring [^enoarhiubc][vlmjptwfchb][aeiou]r 
SFX G 0 ring [^lfeas][^iobrswh][vb][aeou]r 
SFX G 0 ring [^nsecbwo][^aeiovblmpntd][aeiou]r 
SFX G 0 ring [bc][hl][aeiou]r 
SFX G 0 ring [icdro][enc][mtfc][aeiou]r 
SFX G 0 sing [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX G 0 ting [^aeio][aeiou]t 
SFX G 0 ving [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX G ie ying ie 
SFX G 0 zing [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX J Y 58
SFX J 0 bing's [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX J 0 bings [^aeio][aeiou]b 
SFX J 0 ding's [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX J 0 dings [^aeio][aeiou]d 
SFX J 0 fing's [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX J 0 fings [^aeio][aeiou]f 
SFX J 0 ging's [^aeiol][aeiou]g 
SFX J 0 ging's [^ao][l][aeiou]g 
SFX J 0 gings [^aeiol][aeiou]g 
SFX J 0 gings [^ao][l][aeiou]g 
SFX J 0 ing's [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX J 0 ing's [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX J 0 ing's [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX J e ing's [^eioy]e 
SFX J 0 ing's [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX J 0 ing's [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX J 0 ing's [aeo]al 
SFX J 0 ing's [ao]log 
SFX J 0 ing's [eoy]e 
SFX J 0 ing's [oa][lvpb][o]r 
SFX J 0 ings [^aeio]e[nrt] 
SFX J 0 ings [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX J 0 ings [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz] 
SFX J e ings [^eioy]e 
SFX J 0 ings [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz] 
SFX J 0 ings [aeio][eiou]l 
SFX J 0 ings [aeo]al 
SFX J 0 ings [ao]log 
SFX J 0 ings [eoy]e 
SFX J 0 ings [oa][lvpb][o]r 
SFX J 0 king's [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX J 0 king's [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX J 0 kings [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX J 0 kings [^aeio][aeiou]k 
SFX J 0 ling's [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX J 0 ling's [^aeo]al 
SFX J 0 lings [^aeio][eiou]l 
SFX J 0 lings [^aeo]al 
SFX J 0 ming's [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX J 0 mings [^aeio][aeiou]m 
SFX J 0 ning's [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX J 0 nings [^aeio][aiou]n 
SFX J 0 ping's [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX J 0 pings [^aeio][aeiou]p 
SFX J 0 ring's [^aeiolvpb][aiou]r 
SFX J 0 ring's [b][a]r 
SFX J 0 rings [^aeiolvpb][aiou]r 
SFX J 0 rings [b][a]r 
SFX J 0 sing's [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX J 0 sings [^aeio][aeiou]s 
SFX J 0 ting's [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX J 0 tings [^aeio][aiou]t 
SFX J 0 ving's [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX J 0 vings [^aeio][aeiou]v 
SFX J ie ying's ie 
SFX J ie yings ie 
SFX J 0 zing's [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX J 0 zings [^aeio][aeiou]z 
SFX k Y 8
SFX k 0 ingly [^aeiou][cl] 
SFX k 0 ingly [^ecl] 
SFX k e ingly [^eioy]e 
SFX k 0 ingly [aeio][aeiou][cl] 
SFX k 0 ingly [eoy]e 
SFX k 0 kingly [^aeio][aeiou]c 
SFX k 0 lingly [^aeio][aeiou]l 
SFX k ie yingly ie 
