dictionaries/aoo-mozilla-en-dict/dicts/en_GB (-ize) (Oxford)/en_GB-oxendict.dic
absorb/kVNXRDGSh
access/NSXDyMbG
accumulate/DSGVnvu
acquiesce/DSGk
adroit/TYP
advocate/NDVSGM
aerate/SnDG
aftercool/SGDr
agonize/RDGShk
altercate/n
anchoretical/Y
annunciate/DnSG
antique/MSDNG
appraise/k
appreciate/vyGVDnuS
appreciative/IYP
apprehend/DvNVSGuXr
ascribe/DGXSV
aspire/xSDnGr
assibilate/JSNDG
attribute/MxGVvDSR
austere/YPT
autoregulate/SGDNy
aviate/SDGn
banter/MkdSr
baste/nSGD
bedazzle/DLSG
befool/SGDJ
bind/kRJSGM
BlackBerry/DGSMé
boast/DRG6jJSM
body/pDMSYG
bore/RGSMkDW
bounce/kZSRG2DM
brecciate/SGDN
bullyrag/SGDJ
bushel/MSDGJ
bustle/kSGDM
cab/GMDXVSNr
carbon/9S8W-Mnp
casualize/SGDN
catheterize/SGDN
centre/GDRMJ3WoSp
charm/MRGkDpS
chemomechanical/Y
chlorine/nM
circumnavigate/DnSxG
cloy/DkSG
collaborate/VGDSvn
collide/XDGxNSR
collude/DGNVSX
colour/-8RNpGJSnD6jM37
compile/RCNS7DG
complex/GxDYTPNXS
compress/XvNVhxb
concentrate/SGnVD
condescend/NXk
conform/Ox3R7l
congress/mxM5GSD
congruent/Y
conjure/RGSnD
contrast/GvZSMDkV
coproduce/SGDnr
counterrotate/SGDN
crayfish/SGDM
criticize/k
cycle/JrD3SWGwM1
cytogenetic/3YOS
daunt/DGkpS
de-anglicize/SGDN
decide/DBGVivhNxXuS
decompress/NXG
deduce/DGnbVvSR
deform/xnR7G
dehusk/SGD
deindustrialize/SGDN
deinstall/NXRSGD
delude/vkxSGVDuR
demonize/SDGN
denominate/x
depressurize/SGDN
derogate/VSGnyD
devise/GSRJDM
devote/ixh
direct/TxPDGySYV
disaffirm/SGDN
disbelieve/k
disintermediate/SGDN
dispute/MlnRDGS
dissentious/Y
distend/SGXN
divide/MRuDSGxVXvN
dollarize/SGDN
drawl/SGDkR
duck/GDZSMJR
educ/nxV
eight/HMZS
eighty-eight/H
eighty-four/H
eighty-seven/H
eighty-three/H
electroencephalographic/OY
eleven/HMS
emancipate/DSnGy
embrittle/SGD
emerse/DN
engirdle/SGDJ
enquire/GZSDRk
erode/VDuGxSb
ethnosemantic/SY
eviscerate/GDSn
except/xDGS
exhibit/XVdS
explicate/VSnvGDY
explore/SnDRyG
exposit/yXN
extend/iDRVvhGNSxubX
fail/SDGkJ
fancy/RTjPYDSM6G
fence/RSDMJGp
ferment/nDGR7
fifty-eight/H
fifty-four/H
fifty-seven/H
fifty-three/H
five/SHMR
flow/MkRGDS
flute/JDZSMGá
ford/7MGDSp
forty-five/H
forty-nine/H
forty-six/H
forty/HMS
fourteen/HSM
free-handed/Y
fuse/SIX4NGFD
Gallicize/SGDJ
gastrula/SMn
gelatinize/SGDN
gestate/SxDGn
glide/GSRDJM
glitter/dSZkJM
God-fearing/Y
grade/JMY
hack/zJSGD7RkM
harass/GSDLRk
hebdomadal/Y
helm/mSGMD
heroize/SGDJ
homogenize/DRGSn
humify/SGDN
hydrostatic/SOY
hypostatize/SGDJn
impasse/MulXbN
impress/DXVLbNvur
impute/GDnS
incise/XVGvDNSu
incite/DGXRLS
inculpate/DGS
inexorable/YP
inflect/7GxSVD
ingratiate/nGDSk
inoculate/VGDSn
inscribe/RNX
institute/VGRxDMS
interject/xGSD
intone/xn
invade/RXVuDGSN
investigate/AGDSN
inwrap/SGDJ
iridescent/Y
irritate/BnSkhVDG
jive/MDGS
kidnap/DRGJSM
kill/SRkJ7GDM
lash/rGJMDSp
liberal/IY
live/kyRGTDPJY7S
loot/RSDGM
lustrate/SGDN
maladapt/VDn
manumit/XNSGD
mash/RJSGDM
mature/YDTVSxnPGr
meander/rdJSk
meaningless/PY
militarize/CSDGN
million/MHS
mince/RDGkSJ
mismarry/SGD
mucilaginous/Y
multiplicate/SGDMn
munge/RGSJD
n/nxVvu
nineteen/HSM
ninety-five/H
ninety-nine/H
ninety-six/H
ninety/HMS
not/7NxdgnlS
nude/Y3SMTP
numb/RkTYDPGS
obligate/SxyGnD
oblige/EGDS
obscure/NSDTGYP
obviate/DnSG
oppose/SNxXGDR
oppugn/rSGDJ
overt/Y
pad/DMGJZSá
passivize/SGDnr
patinate/SGDN
percept/vbVMoxSu
permit/GXDMNS
pessimal/Y
pick/7JZGSRDM
place/EDRSLG
plagiarize/DRGSN
plead/SDRGJk
possess/EGKDSNAX
preach/RJL
precess/GDSNx
precise/NPIXY
preclude/DSXNG
preponderate/GYSDN
preserve/DnV
process/7MSGxD
profess/DxhSG
prologue/DGSdM
propose/DRGSx
proscribe/DSXVGNr
psychotherapeutic/SOY
punctuate/DSGxn
puzzle/GDJkSRLM
quintillion/HSM
radiosensitize/SGDNR
ramble/MkJDRSGY
ramify/nSDG
rebase/SGD
recess/GMNuSXDVv
recreate/xSGD
redesignate/SGDN
refulgent/Y
relate/FnvSVDG
remineralize/SGDN
remint/SGDJ
remit/GXNSDpR
repel/RnSGDk
reperceive/SGD
resume/GSNDX
revise/OXNSGDRM
rubricate/DGS
ruin/dMSn
sack/M6JSr
satisfy/BDkRSG
savour/YR7pMGS2DZk
scribble/RSGDJ
sensate/x
seven/HMS
seventy-eight/H
seventy-four/H
seventy-seven/H
seventy-three/H
shock/GRSDkM
shudder/MZSdk
sixth/Y
sixty-eight/H
sixty-seven/H
snivel/RSDGJM
sober/YdkPS
solidify/DnGS
sool/DGS
sporulate/SGDN
square/rPMTDSYG
stand/SfGJ
subcontract/SGDM
submerse/SbXGDN
succeed/7rGSDk
sum/8NSRMXDG
supercilious/YP
supervise/DNGXS
supplicate/GDSn
suppress/NXVGDSb
tempt/SRnGDk
ten/lSHg7M
tens/xNTSDXG
terminate/DG
the/GJZ
thirty-four/H
thirty-three/H
tidy/GYSDTM
transact/x
transport/SMBn
trepan/SGDN
trillion/HSM
twenty-four/H
twenty-three/H
umlaut/GDSM
uncouth/Y
unspectacular/Y
vanish/GJSkDMr
variate/MnxSGD
ventilate/SDGnV
veto/MGDSé
vis/bNX
voluntary/YSM
winterize/SGDN
woodcut/SRJM
yearn/DJGkSr
yoke/UDGS
